Washington statutes.
RCW 19.77.930

Construction—1989 c 72.

It is the intent of the legislature that, in construing this chapter, the courts be guided by the interpretation given by the federal courts to the federal trademark act of 1946, as amended, 15 U.S.C., Sec. 1051, et seq.

[ 1989 c 72 s 13.]